test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-IA-pimisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimisin - lie down : # Ordinary VAI verb,  

     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: pimisini
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: pimisinik
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: pimisinîtân
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: pimisinîhkan
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: pimisinîhkêk
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: pimisinîhkahk
    
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: pimisin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: pimisiniyiwa
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nipimisininân
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kipimisininaw, kipimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kipimisininâwâw
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: pimisinwak
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: pimisiniyiwa
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-pimisinin, nikîpimisinin] 
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-pimisinin, kikîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-pimisin, kîpimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-pimisinin, nikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-pimisinin, kikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-pimisin, kapimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-pimisinin, niwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-pimisinin, kiwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-pimisin, wîpimisin]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-pimisiniyân, êpimisiniyân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-pimisiniyan, êpimisiniyan]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-pimisihk, êpimisihk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-pimisiniyit, êpimisiniyit]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-pimisiniyâhk, êpimisiniyâhk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-pimisiniyahk, êpimisiniyahk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-pimisiniyêk, êpimisiniyêk]
     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-pimisihkik, êpimisihkik]

     pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kîpimisiniyân, ê-kî-pimisiniyân, êkî-pimisiniyân, êkîpimisiniyân]
     
     
     
